Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Interagency Farm to School Council

§ 69-1-351.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms effective July 1, 2015.

§69-1-351. [Laws, 2013, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 2013.)]

§ 69-1-353.
Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 69-1-351 and 69-1-353, the following terms shall have the meanings herein ascribed unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Council” means the Interagency Farm to School Council created in Section 69-1-351.

“Farm to school program” means any commercial relationship where a school purchases locally grown or locally raised agricultural products to serve in school meals and can include educational programs for students on local agriculture and nutrition;

“Locally grown or locally raised agricultural products” means any food products grown on Mississippi farms or gardens, and includes, but is not limited to, fruits, vegetables, and nuts grown in Mississippi, meat, poultry, eggs, dairy, fish, seafood and other aquatic products produced in Mississippi, and products processed into value-added products that are grown or produced in Mississippi;

“School” means any K-12 accredited public or private institution for learning and also includes public and private preschools.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 464, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 2013.).